Utah statutes.
13-24-7.   Statute of limitations.

An action for misappropriation shall be brought within three years after the misappropriation is discovered or, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, should have been discovered.  For the purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation constitutes a single claim.

